Mississippi, session 2026, SB3383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Lee County, Mississippi, is authorized, in its power, to expend any available funds of the county for the purchase of radar speed detection equipment.  Such expenditure may be in an amount that the board determines is sufficient, and such purchase shall be for use by the sheriff's department.  If the board of supervisors authorizes the expenditure of funds for this purpose, then the Sheriff of Lee County and any duly sworn deputy sheriff of the county may operate and use the equipment to enforce the motor vehicle speed limits on any public county road or state highway where there is located a school zone, which is located outside the corporate limits of any incorporated municipality. As used in this section, "school zone" means designated roadway segments approaching, adjacent to, and beyond school buildings or grounds, or where school-related activities occur. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.